Hawaii statutes.
§425-202 Foreign
mergers. (a) Whenever a foreign
entity authorized to transact business in this State shall be a party to a
statutory merger permitted by the laws of the state or country under the laws
of which it is organized, and the foreign entity shall be the surviving entity,
it shall, within sixty days after the merger becomes effective, file with the
director a certificate evidencing the merger, duly authenticated by the proper
officer of the state or country under the laws of which the statutory merger
was effectuated. The certificate evidencing the merger shall be evidence of a
change of name if the name of the surviving entity is changed thereby. If the
certificate is in a foreign language a translation attested to under oath by
the translator shall accompany the certificate.

(b) Whenever a foreign entity authorized to
transact business in this State shall be a party to a statutory merger
permitted by the laws of the state or country under the laws of which it is
organized, and that entity shall not be the surviving entity, the surviving
entity shall, within sixty days after the merger becomes effective, file with
the director a certificate evidencing the merger in the form prescribed by
subsection (a). [L 2002, c 41, pt of §3; am L 2003, c 124, §58; am L 2004, c
121, §33]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next